Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.190

Legislative ordinances and resolutions.

Every resolution and ordinance adopted by the commission shall be signed by the mayor or by two members of the commission and filed and recorded within five days of its passage. The mayor shall have no veto power.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.190. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 10, part; RRS s 9099, part.]